Montana, session 2025, HB755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Ownership of real property by certain aliens or foreign entities
prohibited. (1) An alien who is not a resident of this state or a foreign entity may not own real property in this
state.
(2) An alien or foreign entity who violates this section shall divest from the interest in the real
property within 6 months, after which time the property may be sold at public auction by the county sheriff of
any county where the real property is located.
(3) The attorney general or the county attorney of the county where the real property is located
may bring a suit to enforce this section.
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Alien" means any person not a citizen or national of the United States.
(b) "Foreign entity" means an entity that is organized under the laws of a foreign country or has its
principal place of business in a foreign country.
(c) "Real property" has the meaning provided in 70-1-106.
(d) "Resident" means a person lawfully domiciled in the state of Montana or who lawfully maintains
a permanent place of abode within the state even though temporarily absent from the state and who has not
established a residence elsewhere.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 755

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 755.1
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 70, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 70, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Applicability. [This act] applies to property purchased on or after [the
effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 755